Tennessee, session 114, HB0305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 38, Chapter 1, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
38-1-1001. Part definitions.
As used in this part, "qualified nonprofit organization" means a legally
constituted, non-governmental entity incorporated under state law as a charitable or non-
profit organization that is tax-exempt according to 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).
38-1-1002. Automatic notification of emergency assistance services for rental
properties.
(a) A law enforcement agency must send automatic notification to a qualified no-
profit organization of calls received for emergency assistance services at a rental home
or apartment complex, if the qualified nonprofit organization has registered the address
of the rental home or apartment complex with the law enforcement agency for the
purpose of distributing the calls for service to rental property owners and managers.
(b) A rental property owner or manager may contact a registered qualified
nonprofit organization to sign up to receive the distribution of the automatic notification of
calls for emergency assistance at the owner or manager's properties for the purpose of
detecting and acting on crime patterns.
HB0305
000582
- 1 -

SECTION 2. The headings in this act are for reference purposes only and do not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the headings in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000582